West Virginia, session 2026, HB5339.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2A. teachers bill of rights. §18A-2A-2. Prohibition of retaliation toward school employees for opinions expressed on social media. No public school district nor supervisor shall take adverse action against a public school employee for expressing opinions on social media or otherwise in public.  Allegations of slander or libel against an employee shall not be addressed by disciplinary or job action.